Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-614
Change in practice; new or amended agreement.

If a certified nurse midwife intends to alter his or her practice status by reason of a change in the setting, supervision by a different licensed practitioner, modification of the authorized medical functions, or for any other reason, he or she shall submit a new or amended practice agreement to the board for approval before any change may be permitted.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 17;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 88;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1754;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 226.